Washington statutes.
RCW 19.126.050

Suppliers' prohibited acts.

No supplier may:

(1) Coerce or induce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesale distributor to engage in any illegal act or course of conduct;

(2) Require a wholesale distributor to assent to any unreasonable requirement, condition, understanding, or term of an agreement which prohibits a wholesaler from selling the product of any other supplier or suppliers;

(3) Require a wholesale distributor to accept delivery of any product or any other item or commodity which was not ordered by the wholesale distributor; or

(4) Fail or refuse to enter into an agreement of distributorship with a wholesale distributor that handles the supplier's products.

[ 1985 c 440 s 1; 1984 c 169 s 5.]